Maryland, session 2026, SB0197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 1–414 through 1–418 of Article – Land Use of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 1–417 through 1–421, respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Land Use
1–406.
(a) [(1)] The planning commission for a charter county shall include in the
comprehensive or general plan the [visions] PLANNING PRINCIPLES under § 1–201 of this
title and the following elements:
[(i)] (1) a [development regulations] LAND element;
(2) A TRANSPORTATION ELEMENT;
[(ii)] (3) a housing element;
[(iii) a sensitive areas element;]
[(iv)] (4) [a transportation] AN ECONOMY element; [and]
[(v)] (5) [a water resources] AN EQUITY element;
(6) A RESILIENCE ELEMENT;
(7) A PLACE ELEMENT; AND
(8) AN ECOLOGY ELEMENT.
[(2) If current geological information is available, the plan shall include a
mineral resources element.
(b) The planning commission for a charter county may include in the plan a
priority preservation area element developed in accordance with § 2–518 of the Agriculture
Article.]
(B) THE PLAN SHALL PROVIDE GOALS, OBJECTIVES, GUIDELINES,
STANDARDS, AND STRATEGIES FOR THE ORDERLY AND BALANCED FUTURE
ECONOMIC, SOCIAL, PHYSICAL, ENVIRONMENTAL, AND FISCAL DEVELOPMENT OF
THE COUNTY.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(C) (1) THE PLANNING COMMISSION FOR A CHARTER COUNTY SHALL:
(I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
DETERMINE THE APPROPRIATE FORMAT AND ORGANIZATIONAL STRUCTURE OF THE
PLAN, PROVIDED THE ELEMENTS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE ARE
ADDRESSED; AND
(II) DETERMINE WHETHER TO INCLUDE ADDITIONAL ELEMENTS
IN THE PLAN.
(2) ELEMENTS MAY BE FORMATTED AS INDIVIDUAL CHAPTERS OR
ADDRESSED IN MULTIPLE CHAPTERS.
(D) (1) EACH ELEMENT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(I) INCLUDE AND ADDRESS ALL REQUIRED SUBELEMENTS;
(II) BE INFORMED BY RELEVANT EXISTING AND ANTICIPATED
FUTURE CONDITIONS AND STATE AND LOCAL PLANS; AND
(III) IDENTIFY THE NEEDS TO BE ADDRESSED AND THE GOALS TO
BE ACHIEVED.
(2) (I) THE PLAN SHALL INCLUDE A STATEMENT OF GOALS AND
OBJECTIVES, POLICIES, AND STANDARDS.
(II) THE STATEMENT SHALL:
1. SERVE AS A GUIDE FOR THE DEVELOPMENT AND
ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL WELL–BEING OF THE COUNTY;
2. BE INFORMED BY INTERGOVERNMENTAL
COORDINATION WITH ADJACENT JURISDICTIONS AND RELEVANT REGULATORY
AUTHORITIES; AND
3. SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
IDENTIFY STRATEGIES TO BE IMPLEMENTED, INCLUDING APPROPRIATE
RECOMMENDED DEVELOPMENT REGULATIONS, POLICIES, PROGRAMS, AND OTHER
MECHANISMS TO ADDRESS THE NEEDS AND GOALS OF THE PLAN.
(3) THE DEVELOPMENT REGULATIONS, POLICIES, PROGRAMS, AND
OTHER MECHANISMS INCLUDED IN THE PLAN SHALL ENCOURAGE:
– 3 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) THE USE OF FLEXIBLE DEVELOPMENT REGULATIONS TO
PROMOTE INNOVATIVE AND COST–SAVING SITE DESIGN, IMPLEMENT THE PLANNING
PRINCIPLES, AND PROTECT THE ENVIRONMENT; AND
(II) WITHIN THE AREAS DESIGNATED FOR GROWTH IN THE
PLAN:
1. PROMOTE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT THROUGH THE
USE OF INNOVATIVE TECHNIQUES; AND
2. PROVIDE FOR THE STREAMLINED REVIEW OF
APPLICATIONS FOR DEVELOPMENT, INCLUDING PERMIT REVIEW AND SUBDIVISION
PLAT REVIEW.
(E) (1) IN PREPARING THE PLAN, THE PLANNING COMMISSION FOR A
CHARTER COUNTY MAY REQUEST THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING TO FACILITATE
STATE AGENCY ASSISTANCE WITH AVAILABLE DATA AND ANALYSIS.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL PROVIDE GUIDELINES
ON HOW TO ADDRESS THE ELEMENTS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AND
IDENTIFY BEST PRACTICES TO BE CONSIDERED.
[1–407.
(a) The development regulations element shall include the planning commission’s
recommendation for land development regulations to implement the plan.
(b) The development regulations element shall encourage:
(1) the use of flexible development regulations to promote innovative and
cost–saving site design and protect the environment; and
(2) within the areas designated for growth in the plan:
(i) economic development through the use of innovative techniques;
and
(ii) streamlined review of applications for development, including
permit review and subdivision plat review.]
1–407.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(A) IN ADDITION TO IMPLEMENTING THE PLANNING PRINCIPLE IN §
1–201(B)(1) OF THIS TITLE, THE LAND ELEMENT SHALL ADDRESS:
(1) THE GENERAL DISTRIBUTION, LOCATION, AND EXTENT OF USES
OF THE LAND FOR HOUSING, BUSINESS, INDUSTRY, AGRICULTURE, RECREATION,
EDUCATION, PUBLIC BUILDINGS AND GROUNDS, OPEN SPACE, AND OTHER
CATEGORIES OF PUBLIC AND PRIVATE USES OF LAND APPROPRIATE TO THE
COUNTY;
(2) DESIRED PATTERNS AND LOCATIONS OF GROWTH CONSIDERING
EFFECTIVE AND EFFICIENT DELIVERY OF COMMUNITY FACILITIES AND PUBLIC
SERVICES AND THE PROTECTION AND PRESERVATION OF VULNERABLE NATURAL
AND HISTORIC RESOURCES;
(3) COMMUNITY FACILITIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D)
OF THIS SECTION; AND
(4) IF APPLICABLE:
(I) MINERAL RESOURCES IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(E) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) FISHERIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS
SECTION.
(B) (1) THE LAND ELEMENT SHALL BE INFORMED BY THE FOLLOWING
STATE PLANS:
(I) THE MARYLAND THE BEAUTIFUL PLAN, AS DESCRIBED IN §
5–104 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE;
(II) THE MARYLAND LAND PRESERVATION AND RECREATION
PLAN, AS DESCRIBED IN § 5–906 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE; AND
(III) THE STATEWIDE HISTORIC PRESERVATION PLAN, AS
REQUIRED UNDER THE NATIONAL HISTORIC PRESERVATION ACT.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE A CHARTER COUNTY WITH THE BEST AVAILABLE
POPULATION AND DEMOGRAPHIC DATA FROM THE U.S. CENSUS BUREAU AND
STATE–LEVEL LAND USE DATA; AND
– 5 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) FACILITATE, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE PROVISION OF
DATA RELEVANT TO THE PREPARATION OF THE LAND ELEMENT FROM OTHER STATE
AND FEDERAL AGENCIES.
(C) THE LAND ELEMENT MAY INCLUDE:
(1) DESIGNATION OF EXISTING AND PROPOSED LAND USE PATTERNS
USING LAND USE MAPS THAT DEPICT THE TYPES OF USES WITH RANGES OF DENSITY
OR INTENSITY;
(2) IDENTIFICATION OF AREAS OF FUTURE PLANNED MIXED–USE
DEVELOPMENT FOR WHICH SPECIAL REGULATIONS MAY BE NECESSARY TO ENSURE
DEVELOPMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PRINCIPLES AND STANDARDS OF THE
COMPREHENSIVE PLAN;
(3) IDENTIFICATION AND DEPICTION OF HISTORIC DISTRICT
BOUNDARIES AND HISTORICALLY SIGNIFICANT PROPERTIES MERITING
PROTECTION; AND
(4) IDENTIFICATION OF AREAS OF RESOURCE PROTECTION AND
PRESERVATION.
(D) (1) THE LAND ELEMENT SHALL INCLUDE A COMMUNITY FACILITIES
SUBELEMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) ON A SCHEDULE THAT EXTENDS AS FAR INTO THE FUTURE AS IS
REASONABLE, THE COMMUNITY FACILITIES SUBELEMENT SHALL PROPOSE THE
MOST APPROPRIATE AND DESIRABLE PATTERNS FOR THE GENERAL LOCATION,
CHARACTER, SERVICE AREAS, AND EXTENT OF PUBLIC AND SEMIPUBLIC BUILDINGS,
LAND, AND FACILITIES.
(3) THE COMMUNITY FACILITIES SUBELEMENT MAY INCLUDE:
(I) PLACES OF WORSHIP;
(II) (I) FIRE STATIONS;
(III) HOSPITALS;
(IV) (II) INSTITUTIONS;
(V) (III) JAILS;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(VI) (IV) LIBRARIES;
(VII) (V) PARKS AND RECREATION AREAS;
(VIII) (VI) POLICE STATIONS;
(IX) (VII) SCHOOLS AND OTHER EDUCATIONAL FACILITIES;
(X) (VIII) CULTURAL FACILITIES;
(XI) (IX) SOCIAL WELFARE AND MEDICAL FACILITIES; AND
(XII) (X) OTHER PUBLIC OFFICE OR ADMINISTRATIVE
FACILITIES.
(E) (1) IF CURRENT GEOLOGICAL INFORMATION IS AVAILABLE, THE
LAND ELEMENT SHALL INCLUDE A MINERAL RESOURCES SUBELEMENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) THE MINERAL RESOURCES SUBELEMENT SHALL IDENTIFY:
(I) UNDEVELOPED LAND THAT SHOULD BE KEPT IN ITS
UNDEVELOPED STATE UNTIL THE LAND CAN BE USED TO ASSIST IN PROVIDING A
CONTINUOUS SUPPLY OF MINERALS, AS DEFINED IN § 15–801 OF THE ENVIRONMENT
ARTICLE; AND
(II) APPROPRIATE POSTEXCAVATION USES FOR THE LAND THAT
ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE COUNTY’S LAND PLANNING PROCESS.
(3) THE MINERAL RESOURCES SUBELEMENT SHALL INCORPORATE
LAND USE POLICIES AND RECOMMENDATIONS FOR REGULATIONS TO:
(I) BALANCE MINERAL RESOURCE EXTRACTION WITH OTHER
LAND USES; AND
(II) PREVENT THE PREEMPTION OF MINERAL RESOURCES
EXTRACTION BY OTHER USES TO THE EXTENT FEASIBLE.
(4) BEFORE THE PLAN IS ADOPTED, THE DEPARTMENT OF THE
ENVIRONMENT SHALL REVIEW THE MINERAL RESOURCES SUBELEMENT TO
DETERMINE WHETHER THE PROPOSED PLAN IS CONSISTENT WITH THE PROGRAMS
AND GOALS OF THE DEPARTMENT.
– 7 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(F) (1) IF THE CHARTER COUNTY IS LOCATED ON THE TIDAL WATERS OF
THE STATE, THE LAND ELEMENT SHALL INCLUDE A FISHERIES SUBELEMENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) THE FISHERIES SUBELEMENT SHALL DESIGNATE AREAS ON OR
NEAR THE TIDAL WATERS FOR:
(I) LOADING, UNLOADING, AND PROCESSING FINFISH AND
SHELLFISH; AND
(II) DOCKING AND MOORING COMMERCIAL FISHING BOATS AND
VESSELS.
(3) THE AREAS DESIGNATED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE GEOGRAPHICALLY LOCATED TO:
(I) FACILITATE THE COMMERCIAL HARVESTING OF FINFISH
AND SHELLFISH; AND
(II) ENSURE REASONABLE ACCESS TO THE WATERWAYS OF THE
STATE BY COMMERCIAL WATERMEN.
(G) THE LAND ELEMENT MAY INCLUDE A PRIORITY PRESERVATION AREA
SUBELEMENT DEVELOPED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–518 OF THE AGRICULTURE
ARTICLE.
[1–407.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Affirmatively further fair housing” has the meaning stated in § 2–401
of the Housing and Community Development Article.
(3) “Area median income” has the meaning stated in § 4–1801 of the
Housing and Community Development Article.
(4) “Low–income housing” means housing that is affordable for a household
with an aggregate annual income that is below 60% of the area median income.
(5) “Workforce housing” has the meaning stated in § 4–1801 of the Housing
and Community Development Article.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(b) A housing element may include goals, objectives, policies, plans, and
standards.
(c) A housing element shall address the need for affordable housing within the
county, including:
(1) workforce housing; and
(2) low–income housing.
(d) (1) A county has a duty to affirmatively further fair housing through the
county’s housing and urban development programs.
(2) The housing element of a comprehensive plan that is enacted or
amended on or after January 1, 2025, shall include an assessment of fair housing to ensure
that the county is affirmatively furthering fair housing.
(3) On request of a county, the Department of Planning, in consultation
with the Department of Housing and Community Development, shall provide technical
assistance for the purpose of developing the housing element of the comprehensive plan.
(4) This subsection does not require a county to take, or prohibit a county
from taking, a specific action to affirmatively further fair housing.]
[1–408.
(a) (1) A sensitive areas element shall include the goals, objectives, principles,
policies, and standards designed to protect sensitive areas from the adverse effects of
development.
(2) A charter county shall consider wildlife movement and habitat
connectivity when enacting, adopting, amending, or executing a plan in accordance with §
1–405 of this subtitle.
(b) (1) Beginning October 1, 2013, the Department of Natural Resources shall
provide a statewide forest resource inventory to local jurisdictions at least every 5 years, to
be available for the local comprehensive plan review by local jurisdictions required under §
1–416(a) of this subtitle and § 3–301(a) of this article.
(2) The Department of Planning shall coordinate with the Department of
Natural Resources and the State Highway Administration to provide each charter county
with updated information on habitat connectivity concerns and current and planned
wildlife crossings.
– 9 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) Before the plan is adopted, the Department of the Environment and the
Department of Natural Resources shall review the sensitive areas element to determine
whether the proposed plan is consistent with the programs and goals of the departments.]
1–408.
(A) IN ADDITION TO IMPLEMENTING THE PLANNING PRINCIPLE IN §
1–201(B)(2) OF THIS TITLE, THE TRANSPORTATION ELEMENT SHALL ADDRESS:
(1) A SAFE, BALANCED TRANSPORTATION SYSTEM FOR THE
MOVEMENT OF PEOPLE AND GOODS;
(2) A RANGE OF SUSTAINABLE TRANSPORTATION CHOICES FOR
FUTURE TRANSPORTATION NEEDS; AND
(3) COORDINATION WITH THE LAND ELEMENT TO ENSURE
TRANSPORTATION EFFICIENCY FOR EXISTING AND PLANNED DEVELOPMENT.
(B) (1) THE TRANSPORTATION ELEMENT SHALL BE INFORMED BY THE
FOLLOWING STATE PLANS:
(I) THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION PLAN, AS DESCRIBED
IN § 2–103.1 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE;
(II) THE STATEWIDE 20–YEAR BICYCLE–PEDESTRIAN MASTER
PLAN, AS DESCRIBED IN § 2–604 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; AND
(III) THE MARYLAND STATE FREIGHT PLAN, AS REQUIRED
UNDER 49 U.S.C. § 70202.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE A CHARTER COUNTY WITH THE BEST AVAILABLE
STATE–LEVEL DATA; AND
(II) FACILITATE, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE PROVISION OF
DATA RELEVANT TO THE PREPARATION OF THE TRANSPORTATION ELEMENT FROM
OTHER STATE AND FEDERAL AGENCIES.
(C) THE TRANSPORTATION ELEMENT MAY INCLUDE ALL TYPES OF:
(1) AIRWAYS;
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(2) HIGHWAYS OR STREETS;
(3) RAILWAYS;
(4) WATERWAYS;
(5) ROUTINGS FOR MASS TRANSIT; AND
(6) TERMINALS FOR INDIVIDUALS, GOODS, AND VEHICLES RELATED
TO AIRWAYS, HIGHWAYS, RAILWAYS, AND WATERWAYS.
(D) THE TRANSPORTATION ELEMENT SHALL:
(1) PROPOSE, ON A SCHEDULE THAT EXTENDS AS FAR INTO THE
FUTURE AS IS REASONABLE, THE MOST APPROPRIATE AND DESIRABLE PATTERNS
FOR:
(I) THE GENERAL LOCATION, CHARACTER, AND EXTENT OF
CHANNELS, ROUTES, AND TERMINALS FOR TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES; AND
(II) THE CIRCULATION OF INDIVIDUALS AND GOODS;
(2) PROVIDE FOR BICYCLE AND PEDESTRIAN ACCESS AND
TRAVELWAYS; AND
(3) INCLUDE AN ESTIMATE OF THE USE OF ANY PROPOSED
IMPROVEMENT.
[1–409.
(a) The transportation element may include all types of:
(1) airways;
(2) highways or streets;
(3) railways;
(4) waterways;
(5) routings for mass transit; and
(6) terminals for individuals, goods, and vehicles related to airways,
highways, railways, and waterways.
– 11 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) The transportation element shall:
(1) propose, on a schedule that extends as far into the future as is
reasonable, the most appropriate and desirable patterns for:
(i) the general location, character, and extent of channels, routes,
and terminals for transportation facilities; and
(ii) the circulation of individuals and goods;
(2) provide for bicycle and pedestrian access and travelways; and
(3) include an estimate of the use of any proposed improvement.]
1–409.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AFFIRMATIVELY FURTHER FAIR HOUSING” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 2–401 OF THE HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “AREA MEDIAN INCOME” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 4–1801
OF THE HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
(4) “LOW–INCOME HOUSING” MEANS HOUSING THAT IS AFFORDABLE
FOR A HOUSEHOLD WITH AN AGGREGATE ANNUAL INCOME THAT IS BELOW 60% OF
THE AREA MEDIAN INCOME.
(5) “WORKFORCE HOUSING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 4–1801
OF THE HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
(B) IN ADDITION TO IMPLEMENTING THE PLANNING PRINCIPLE IN §
1–201(B)(3) OF THIS TITLE, THE HOUSING ELEMENT SHALL ADDRESS:
(1) THE PROVISION OF AN ADEQUATE SUPPLY OF HOUSING TO
ACCOMMODATE ALL CURRENT AND ANTICIPATED FUTURE RESIDENTS OF THE
COUNTY;
(2) THE AGE, STRUCTURAL TYPE, VALUE, AND OCCUPANCY
CHARACTERISTICS OF THE COUNTY’S HOUSING STOCK;
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(3) THE ELIMINATION OF SUBSTANDARD DWELLING CONDITIONS;
AND
(4) THE PROVISION OF ADEQUATE SITES FOR FUTURE HOUSING,
INCLUDING AFFORDABLE HOUSING.
(C) (1) THE HOUSING ELEMENT SHALL BE INFORMED BY THE FOLLOWING
STATE PLANS:
(I) THE FAIR HOUSING CHOICE AND RACIAL AND ECONOMIC
HOUSING INTEGRATION REPORT, AS DESCRIBED IN § 2–302 OF THE HOUSING AND
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE; AND
(II) THE STATE OF MARYLAND FIVE YEAR CONSOLIDATED
PLAN, AS REQUIRED BY 24 C.F.R. § 91.300.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL:
1. PROVIDE A CHARTER COUNTY WITH THE BEST
AVAILABLE HOUSING DATA FROM THE U.S. CENSUS BUREAU; AND
2. FACILITATE, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE
PROVISION OF DATA RELEVANT TO THE PREPARATION OF THE HOUSING ELEMENT
FROM OTHER STATE AND FEDERAL AGENCIES.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT SHALL PROVIDE A CHARTER COUNTY WITH THE BEST AVAILABLE
STATE–LEVEL HOUSING DATA.
(D) A HOUSING ELEMENT MAY INCLUDE GOALS, OBJECTIVES, POLICIES,
PLANS, AND STANDARDS.
(E) A HOUSING ELEMENT SHALL ADDRESS THE NEED FOR AFFORDABLE
HOUSING WITHIN THE COUNTY, INCLUDING:
(1) WORKFORCE HOUSING; AND
(2) LOW–INCOME HOUSING.
(F) (1) A COUNTY HAS A DUTY TO AFFIRMATIVELY FURTHER FAIR
HOUSING THROUGH THE COUNTY’S HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT
PROGRAMS.
– 13 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) THE HOUSING ELEMENT OF A COMPREHENSIVE PLAN THAT IS
ENACTED OR AMENDED ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2025, SHALL INCLUDE AN
ASSESSMENT OF FAIR HOUSING TO ENSURE THAT THE COUNTY IS AFFIRMATIVELY
FURTHERING FAIR HOUSING FOR CURRENT AND FUTURE RESIDENTS.
(3) ON REQUEST OF A COUNTY, THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT, SHALL PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE FOR THE PURPOSE OF
DEVELOPING THE HOUSING ELEMENT OF THE COMPREHENSIVE PLAN.
(4) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT REQUIRE A COUNTY TO TAKE, OR
PROHIBIT A COUNTY FROM TAKING, A SPECIFIC ACTION TO AFFIRMATIVELY
FURTHER FAIR HOUSING.
[1–410.
(a) Considering available data provided by the Department of the Environment,
the water resources element shall identify:
(1) drinking water and other water resources that will be adequate for the
needs of existing and future development proposed in the land use element of the plan; and
(2) suitable receiving waters and land areas to meet stormwater
management and wastewater treatment and disposal needs of existing and future
development proposed in the land use element of the plan.
(b) The Department of the Environment shall:
(1) provide, on request of a local jurisdiction, technical assistance on the
development of the water resources element; and
(2) review the water resources element to determine whether the proposed
plan is consistent with the programs and goals of the Department reflected in the general
water resources program required under § 5–203 of the Environment Article.]
1–410.
(A) IN ADDITION TO IMPLEMENTING THE PLANNING PRINCIPLE IN §
1–201(B)(4) OF THIS TITLE, THE ECONOMY ELEMENT SHALL ADDRESS:
(1) THE ECONOMIC BASE, LABOR FORCE CHARACTERISTICS, AND
LOCAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITIES AND RESOURCES OF THE
COUNTY;
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(2) THE CATEGORIES OR TYPES OF BUSINESSES AND INDUSTRIES
DESIRED IN THE COUNTY; AND
(3) THE COORDINATION OF INFORMATION ABOUT POPULATION
TRENDS AND CHARACTERISTICS, NATURAL RESOURCES, COMMUNITY FACILITIES
AND SERVICES, TRANSPORTATION, HOUSING, AND LAND USE SO THAT A STRATEGY
FOR THE ECONOMIC WELL–BEING OF CURRENT AND NEW RESIDENTS OF THE
COUNTY CAN BE DEVELOPED.
(B) (1) THE ECONOMY ELEMENT SHALL BE INFORMED BY THE
FOLLOWING STATE PLANS:
(I) THE STATE WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT PLAN, AS
REQUIRED UNDER THE FEDERAL WORKFORCE INNOVATION AND OPPORTUNITY
ACT FOR A 4–YEAR COMBINED STATE PLAN; AND
(II) THE MARYLAND STATE PLAN FOR POSTSECONDARY
EDUCATION, AS DESCRIBED IN § 11–105 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL:
1. PROVIDE A CHARTER COUNTY WITH THE BEST
AVAILABLE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT DATA FROM THE U.S. CENSUS BUREAU; AND
2. FACILITATE, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE
PROVISION OF DATA RELEVANT TO THE PREPARATION OF THE ECONOMIC ELEMENT
FROM OTHER STATE AND FEDERAL AGENCIES.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE SHALL PROVIDE A
CHARTER COUNTY WITH THE BEST AVAILABLE STATE–LEVEL DATA ON ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT.
(III) THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR SHALL PROVIDE A CHARTER
COUNTY WITH THE BEST AVAILABLE STATE–LEVEL DATA ON THE LABOR FORCE.
(C) THE ECONOMY ELEMENT MAY INCLUDE:
(1) AN ASSESSMENT OF ECONOMIC SECTORS TO DETERMINE
WHETHER AVAILABLE JOBS ALIGN WITH LOCAL LABOR FORCE CHARACTERISTICS,
COMMUTING PATTERNS, AND WAGES PAID, AND WHAT STRATEGIES COULD IMPROVE
THE EXISTING ECONOMIC SITUATION;
– 15 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) AN ANALYSIS OF EXISTING LOCAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
PROGRAMS AND TOOLS, AND WHAT STRATEGIES ARE NEEDED TO FOSTER ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT;
(3) AN ASSESSMENT OF ECONOMIC ASSETS, PROBLEMS, AND
OPPORTUNITIES OF THE LOCAL ECONOMY IN A REGIONAL CONTEXT AND WHAT
STRATEGIES ARE NEEDED TO POSITION THE LOCAL ECONOMY IN THE LARGER
REGIONAL CONTEXT; AND
(4) AN ASSESSMENT OF COMMUNITY REDEVELOPMENT
OPPORTUNITIES AND WHAT STRATEGIES AND PROGRAMS SHOULD BE PURSUED.
[1–411.
(a) The mineral resources element shall identify:
(1) undeveloped land that should be kept in its undeveloped state until the
land can be used to assist in providing a continuous supply of minerals, as defined in §
15–801(i) of the Environment Article; and
(2) appropriate postexcavation uses for the land that are consistent with
the county’s land planning process.
(b) A mineral resources element shall incorporate land use policies and
recommendations for regulations:
(1) to balance mineral resource extraction with other land uses; and
(2) to the extent feasible, to prevent the preemption of mineral resources
extraction by other uses.
(c) Before the plan is adopted, the Department of the Environment shall review
the mineral resources element to determine whether the proposed plan is consistent with
the programs and goals of the Department.]
1–411.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
1–701 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(3) “OVERBURDENED COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
1–701 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(4) “UNDERSERVED COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
1–701 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(B) IN ADDITION TO IMPLEMENTING THE PLANNING PRINCIPLE IN §
1–201(B)(5) OF THIS TITLE, THE EQUITY ELEMENT SHALL ADDRESS:
(1) THE NEEDS OF OVERBURDENED AND UNDERSERVED
COMMUNITIES IN THE COUNTY; AND
(2) THE INTERESTS OF POPULATIONS IN THE COUNTY THAT
TYPICALLY HAVE NOT PARTICIPATED IN THE PLANNING PROCESS.
(C) (1) THE EQUITY ELEMENT SHALL BE INFORMED BY THE ANNUAL
REPORT OF THE COMMISSION ON ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE AND SUSTAINABLE
COMMUNITIES, AS DESCRIBED IN § 1–701 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL:
1. PROVIDE A CHARTER COUNTY WITH THE BEST
AVAILABLE POPULATION AND DEMOGRAPHIC DATA FROM THE U.S. CENSUS
BUREAU; AND
2. FACILITATE, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE
PROVISION OF DATA RELEVANT TO THE PREPARATION OF THE EQUITY ELEMENT
FROM OTHER STATE AND FEDERAL AGENCIES.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT SHALL PROVIDE
A CHARTER COUNTY WITH DATA ON ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE.
(D) THE EQUITY ELEMENT MAY INCLUDE POTENTIAL STRATEGIES TO:
(1) PROMOTE BROADER CIVIC ENGAGEMENT IN THE PUBLIC
DECISION–MAKING PROCESS;
(2) REDUCE THE UNIQUE OR COMPOUNDED HEALTH RISKS AND
ENVIRONMENTAL PROBLEMS IN OVERBURDENED AND UNDERSERVED
COMMUNITIES; AND
(3) PRIORITIZE IMPROVEMENTS AND PROGRAMS THAT ADDRESS THE
NEEDS OF OVERBURDENED AND UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES.
– 17 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[1–412.
(a) This section applies only to a charter county or a code county that was required
before adopting home rule to designate in the comprehensive plan areas on or near the tidal
waters of the State under § 3–113 of this article.
(b) The planning commission of a charter county that is located on the tidal
waters of the State shall designate in the comprehensive plan areas on or near the tidal
waters for:
(1) loading, unloading, and processing finfish and shellfish; and
(2) docking and mooring commercial fishing boats and vessels.
(c) The areas designated under subsection (b) of this section shall be
geographically located to:
(1) facilitate the commercial harvesting of finfish and shellfish; and
(2) ensure reasonable access to the waterways of the State by commercial
watermen.]
1–412.
(A) IN ADDITION TO IMPLEMENTING THE PLANNING PRINCIPLE IN §
1–201(B)(6) OF THIS TITLE, THE RESILIENCE ELEMENT SHALL ADDRESS:
(1) THE COORDINATION OF LOCAL PREPAREDNESS EFFORTS TO
IDENTIFY POTENTIAL THREATS FACING THE COUNTY WITH THE LONG–TERM
STRATEGIES TO AVOID, REDUCE, AND RECOVER FROM CHANGING CONDITIONS AND
ASSOCIATED DISASTERS; AND
(2) THE MUTUAL ASSISTANCE NEEDED AMONG STATE AND LOCAL
PARTNERS TO:
(I) RESPOND TO THE CHALLENGES OF CHANGING CONDITIONS
AND DISASTERS, INCLUDING HUMAN–CAUSED AND NATURAL HAZARDS; AND
(II) BUILD, ADVANCE, AND MAINTAIN CAPACITIES RELATED TO
QUALITY OF LIFE, HEALTH AND WELL–BEING, DURABLE SYSTEMS, ECONOMIC
VITALITY, HUMAN–MADE AND NATURE–BASED INFRASTRUCTURE, AND
SUSTAINABLE ENVIRONMENTAL SYSTEMS.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(B) (1) THE RESILIENCE ELEMENT SHALL BE INFORMED BY THE
FOLLOWING STATE PLANS:
(I) THE STATE RESILIENCE STRATEGY, AS DESCRIBED IN §
14–1202 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE; AND
(II) THE STATE OF MARYLAND HAZARD MITIGATION PLAN, AS
REQUIRED UNDER 44 C.F.R. PART 201.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE A CHARTER COUNTY WITH THE BEST AVAILABLE
POPULATION, DEMOGRAPHIC, ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, AND HOUSING DATA
FROM THE U.S. CENSUS BUREAU AND OTHER STANDARD SOURCES; AND
(II) FACILITATE, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE PROVISION OF
DATA RELEVANT TO THE PREPARATION OF THE RESILIENCE ELEMENT FROM OTHER
STATE AND FEDERAL AGENCIES.
(C) THE RESILIENCE ELEMENT MAY INCLUDE:
(1) AN INVENTORY OF AREAS SUSCEPTIBLE TO NATURAL OR
HUMAN–CAUSED HAZARDS, SUCH AS FLOODING, INCLUDING RIVERINE AND
COASTAL FLOODING, SEA–LEVEL RISE, AND COASTAL STORM SURGE, WHICH
INVENTORY MAY CONSIDER THE POTENTIAL DISASTER IMPACTS ON INDIVIDUALS,
COMMUNITIES, INSTITUTIONS, BUSINESSES, ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, PUBLIC
INFRASTRUCTURE AND FACILITIES, AND PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY, AND WELFARE;
(2) AN INVENTORY OF EXISTING RESILIENCY CONDITIONS THAT
PROMOTE RESILIENT PLANNING, DESIGN, AND DEVELOPMENT, AND THAT MAY BE
COORDINATED WITH OTHER JURISDICTIONS AND STATE AGENCIES; AND
(3) RECOMMENDED STRATEGIES AND POLICIES:
(I) TO PROTECT SUSCEPTIBLE AREAS AND RESOURCES AND
MITIGATE RISKS TO PUBLIC SAFETY, CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE, HISTORIC
STRUCTURES, PUBLIC INVESTMENTS, AND OTHER COMMUNITY RESOURCES; AND
(II) THAT ARE INTENDED TO:
1. REDUCE RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH IDENTIFIED
HAZARDS;
– 19 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. ADAPT TO CHANGING CONDITIONS; AND
3. PROMOTE QUICKER RECOVERY AFTER A DISASTER.
1–413.
(A) IN ADDITION TO IMPLEMENTING THE PLANNING PRINCIPLE IN §
1–201(B)(7) OF THIS TITLE, THE PLACE ELEMENT SHALL:
(1) PLAN, DESIGN, AND PROGRAM PLAN NEW OR REVITALIZED PUBLIC
SPACES TO STRENGTHEN COMMUNITY COHESION WHILE CONTRIBUTING TO PUBLIC
HEALTH, CONNECTING PEOPLE WITH CULTURAL HERITAGE, CONSERVING NATURAL
RESOURCES, IMPROVING RESILIENCE, AND STRENGTHENING THE LOCAL ECONOMY;
AND
(2) PROMOTE THE ACTIVE CARE AND MAINTENANCE OF PUBLIC
SPACES BY THE PEOPLE WHO LIVE AND WORK THERE, SUPPORTING THE
CONTINUATION OF LOCAL WAYS OF LIFE AND CULTURAL MEMORIES.
(B) (1) THE PLACE ELEMENT SHALL BE INFORMED BY THE FOLLOWING
STATE PLANS:
(I) THE MARYLAND LAND PRESERVATION AND RECREATION
PLAN, AS DESCRIBED IN § 5–906 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE; AND
(II) THE STATEWIDE HISTORIC PRESERVATION PLAN, AS
REQUIRED UNDER THE NATIONAL HISTORIC PRESERVATION ACT.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE A CHARTER COUNTY WITH THE BEST AVAILABLE
POPULATION, DEMOGRAPHIC, ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, AND HOUSING DATA
FROM THE U.S. CENSUS BUREAU AND OTHER STANDARD SOURCES; AND
(II) FACILITATE, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE PROVISION OF
DATA RELEVANT TO THE PREPARATION OF THE PLACE ELEMENT FROM OTHER
STATE AND FEDERAL AGENCIES.
(C) THE PLACE ELEMENT MAY INCLUDE:
(1) AN INVENTORY OF GATHERING PLACES FOR SOCIAL
INTERACTIONS AND CENTERS OF ECONOMIC ACTIVITY;
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(2) AN ANALYSIS OF PUBLIC SPACES TO IDENTIFY THOSE OF UNIQUE
CULTURAL AND HISTORICAL SIGNIFICANCE; AND
(3) RECOMMENDED STRATEGIES, POLICIES, AND PROGRAMS TO
BUILD SOCIAL COHESION AND COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT.
1–414.
(A) IN ADDITION TO IMPLEMENTING THE PLANNING PRINCIPLE IN §
1–201(B)(8) OF THIS TITLE, THE ECOLOGY ELEMENT SHALL ADDRESS:
(1) THE PROTECTION OF THE ENVIRONMENT AND NATURAL
RESOURCES, INCLUDING AGRICULTURAL RESOURCES, MINERAL RESOURCES, AND
WATER AND AIR QUALITY;
(2) THE PROTECTION OF SIGNIFICANT ARCHITECTURAL, SCENIC,
CULTURAL, HISTORICAL, OR ARCHAEOLOGICAL RESOURCES;
(3) THE CONSERVATION, USE, AND PROTECTION OF NATURAL
RESOURCES;
(4) THE PRESERVATION AND ENHANCEMENT OF PRIME
AGRICULTURAL LAND AND STRATEGIES TO ENCOURAGE THE COMPATIBILITY OF
LAND USE WITH AGRICULTURAL AND FORESTRY OPERATIONS;
(5) THE PROTECTION OF A RELIABLE SUPPLY OF WATER AND ITS USES
AND LIMITATIONS;
(6) PREVENTING THE DEGRADATION OF THE ABOVE RESOURCES DUE
TO FUTURE DEVELOPMENT PATTERNS PROPOSED IN THE LAND ELEMENT;
(7) GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS FROM ANY ADDITIONAL VEHICLE
MILES TRAVELED LIKELY TO RESULT FROM FUTURE DEVELOPMENT PATTERNS
PROPOSED IN THE LAND ELEMENT;
(8) SENSITIVE AREAS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(9) WATER RESOURCES IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (E) OF
THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) THE ECOLOGY ELEMENT SHALL BE INFORMED BY THE
FOLLOWING STATE PLANS:
– 21 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) MARYLAND’S CLIMATE POLLUTION REDUCTION PLAN, AS
DESCRIBED IN § 2–1205 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE;
(II) THE MARYLAND LAND PRESERVATION AND RECREATION
PLAN, AS DESCRIBED IN § 5–906 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE; AND
(III) THE STATEWIDE COMPREHENSIVE OUTDOOR RECREATION
PLAN, AS REQUIRED UNDER THE FEDERAL LAND AND WATER CONSERVATION
FUND ACT OF 1965.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE A CHARTER COUNTY WITH THE BEST AVAILABLE
POPULATION, DEMOGRAPHIC, ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, AND HOUSING DATA
FROM THE U.S. CENSUS BUREAU AND OTHER STANDARD SOURCES; AND
(II) FACILITATE, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE PROVISION OF
DATA RELEVANT TO THE PREPARATION OF THE ECOLOGY ELEMENT FROM OTHER
STATE AND FEDERAL AGENCIES.
(C) THE ECOLOGY ELEMENT MAY INCLUDE:
(1) AN INVENTORY OF NATURAL, HISTORICAL, AND
ENVIRONMENTALLY SENSITIVE RESOURCES;
(2) AN EVALUATION OF THE ISSUES, PROBLEMS, AND OPPORTUNITIES
ASSOCIATED WITH THESE RESOURCES; AND
(3) STRATEGIES AND POLICIES FOR THE APPROPRIATE USE,
PRESERVATION, AND PROTECTION OF THESE RESOURCES THAT ARE CONSISTENT
WITH THE STRATEGIES AND POLICIES ESTABLISHED FOR OTHER PLAN ELEMENTS.
(D) (1) THE ECOLOGY ELEMENT SHALL INCLUDE A SENSITIVE AREAS
SUBELEMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) THE SENSITIVE AREAS SUBELEMENT SHALL:
(I) INCLUDE GOALS, OBJECTIVES, PRINCIPLES, POLICIES, AND
STANDARDS DESIGNED TO PROTECT SENSITIVE AREAS FROM THE ADVERSE
EFFECTS OF DEVELOPMENT;
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(II) BE INFORMED BY CURRENT STATE AND FEDERAL
REQUIREMENTS REGARDING THE PROTECTION OF SENSITIVE AREAS; AND
(III) INDICATE WHAT ADDITIONAL MEASURES, IF ANY, THE
CHARTER COUNTY PROPOSES TO IMPLEMENT BEYOND THE REQUIREMENTS
DESCRIBED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(3) A CHARTER COUNTY SHALL CONSIDER WILDLIFE MOVEMENT AND
HABITAT CONNECTIVITY WHEN ENACTING, ADOPTING, AMENDING, OR EXECUTING A
PLAN IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 1–405 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(4) (I) THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES SHALL
PROVIDE A CHARTER COUNTY WITH A STATEWIDE FOREST RESOURCE INVENTORY
AT LEAST EVERY 5 YEARS, TO BE AVAILABLE FOR THE LOCAL COMPREHENSIVE PLAN
REVIEW BY THE CHARTER COUNTY REQUIRED UNDER § 1–419(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL COORDINATE
WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES AND THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION TO PROVIDE EACH CHARTER COUNTY WITH UPDATED
INFORMATION ON HABITAT CONNECTIVITY CONCERNS AND CURRENT AND PLANNED
WILDLIFE CROSSINGS.
(5) BEFORE THE PLAN IS ADOPTED, THE DEPARTMENT OF THE
ENVIRONMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES SHALL REVIEW
THE SENSITIVE AREAS SUBELEMENT TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE PROPOSED
PLAN IS CONSISTENT WITH THE PROGRAMS AND GOALS OF THE DEPARTMENTS.
(E) (1) THE ECOLOGY ELEMENT SHALL INCLUDE A WATER RESOURCES
SUBELEMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) CONSIDERING AVAILABLE DATA PROVIDED BY THE DEPARTMENT
OF THE ENVIRONMENT, THE WATER RESOURCES SUBELEMENT SHALL IDENTIFY:
(I) DRINKING WATER AND OTHER WATER RESOURCES THAT
WILL BE ADEQUATE FOR THE NEEDS OF EXISTING AND FUTURE DEVELOPMENT
PROPOSED IN THE LAND USE ELEMENT OF THE PLAN; AND
(II) SUITABLE RECEIVING WATERS AND LAND AREAS TO MEET
STORMWATER MANAGEMENT AND WASTEWATER TREATMENT AND DISPOSAL NEEDS
OF EXISTING AND FUTURE DEVELOPMENT PROPOSED IN THE LAND ELEMENT OF THE
PLAN.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT SHALL:
– 23 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) PROVIDE, ON REQUEST OF A CHARTER COUNTY, TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE ON THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE WATER RESOURCES SUBELEMENT; AND
(II) REVIEW THE WATER RESOURCES SUBELEMENT TO
DETERMINE WHETHER THE PROPOSED PLAN IS CONSISTENT WITH THE PROGRAMS
AND GOALS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT REFLECTED IN THE
GENERAL WATER RESOURCES PROGRAM REQUIRED UNDER § 5–203 OF THE
ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
1–415. RESERVED.
1–416. RESERVED.
3–101.
(a) A local jurisdiction shall enact, adopt, amend, and execute a plan in
accordance with this division.
(b) A municipal corporation may be included as part of a county plan under this
division if:
(1) the legislative body of the municipal corporation, by resolution directed
to the legislative body of the county where the municipal corporation is located, indicates
the intention to participate in the county plan; and
(2) the legislative body of the county approves the resolution.
[3–102.
(a) (1) The planning commission for a local jurisdiction shall include in the
comprehensive plan the following elements:
(i) a community facilities element;
(ii) an area of critical State concern element;
(iii) a goals and objectives element;
(iv) a housing element;
(v) a land use element;
(vi) a development regulations element;
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(vii) a sensitive areas element;
(viii) a transportation element; and
(ix) a water resources element.
(2) If current geological information is available, the plan shall include a
mineral resources element.
(3) The plan for a municipal corporation that exercises zoning authority
shall include a municipal growth element.
(4) The plan for a county that is located on the tidal waters of the State
shall include a fisheries element.
(b) (1) The planning commission for a local jurisdiction may include in the plan
additional elements to advance the purposes of the plan.
(2) The additional elements may include:
(i) community renewal elements;
(ii) conservation elements;
(iii) flood control elements;
(iv) natural resources elements;
(v) pollution control elements;
(vi) the general location and extent of public utilities; and
(vii) a priority preservation area element developed in accordance
with § 2–518 of the Agriculture Article.]
3–102.
(A) THE PLANNING COMMISSION FOR A LOCAL JURISDICTION SHALL
INCLUDE IN THE COMPREHENSIVE PLAN THE FOLLOWING ELEMENTS:
(1) A LAND ELEMENT;
(2) A TRANSPORTATION ELEMENT;
(3) A HOUSING ELEMENT;
– 25 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) AN ECONOMY ELEMENT;
(5) AN EQUITY ELEMENT;
(6) A RESILIENCE ELEMENT;
(7) A PLACE ELEMENT; AND
(8) AN ECOLOGY ELEMENT.
(B) THE PLAN SHALL PROVIDE GOALS, OBJECTIVES, GUIDELINES,
STANDARDS, AND STRATEGIES FOR THE ORDERLY AND BALANCED FUTURE
ECONOMIC, SOCIAL, PHYSICAL, ENVIRONMENTAL, AND FISCAL DEVELOPMENT OF
THE LOCAL JURISDICTION.
(C) (1) THE PLANNING COMMISSION FOR A LOCAL JURISDICTION SHALL:
(I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
DETERMINE THE APPROPRIATE FORMAT AND ORGANIZATIONAL STRUCTURE OF THE
PLAN, PROVIDED THE ELEMENTS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE ARE
ADDRESSED; AND
(II) DETERMINE WHETHER TO INCLUDE ADDITIONAL ELEMENTS
IN THE PLAN.
(2) ELEMENTS MAY BE FORMATTED AS INDIVIDUAL CHAPTERS OR
ADDRESSED IN MULTIPLE CHAPTERS.
(D) (1) EACH ELEMENT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(I) INCLUDE AND ADDRESS ALL REQUIRED SUBELEMENTS;
(II) BE INFORMED BY RELEVANT EXISTING AND ANTICIPATED
FUTURE CONDITIONS AND STATE AND LOCAL PLANS; AND
(III) IDENTIFY THE NEEDS TO BE ADDRESSED AND THE GOALS TO
BE ACHIEVED.
(2) (I) THE PLAN SHALL INCLUDE A STATEMENT OF GOALS AND
OBJECTIVES, PRINCIPLES, POLICIES, AND STANDARDS.
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(II) THE STATEMENT SHALL:
1. SERVE AS A GUIDE FOR THE DEVELOPMENT AND
ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL WELL–BEING OF THE LOCAL JURISDICTION;
2. BE INFORMED BY INTERGOVERNMENTAL
COORDINATION WITH THE ADJACENT JURISDICTIONS AND RELEVANT REGULATORY
AUTHORITIES; AND
3. SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
IDENTIFY STRATEGIES TO BE IMPLEMENTED, INCLUDING APPROPRIATE
RECOMMENDED DEVELOPMENT REGULATIONS, POLICIES, PROGRAMS, AND OTHER
MECHANISMS TO ADDRESS THE NEEDS AND GOALS OF THE PLAN.
(3) THE DEVELOPMENT REGULATION POLICIES, PROGRAMS, AND
OTHER MECHANISMS INCLUDED IN THE PLAN SHALL ENCOURAGE:
(I) THE USE OF FLEXIBLE DEVELOPMENT REGULATIONS TO
PROMOTE INNOVATIVE AND COST–SAVING SITE DESIGN, IMPLEMENT THE PLANNING
PRINCIPLES, AND PROTECT THE ENVIRONMENT; AND
(II) WITHIN THE AREAS DESIGNATED FOR GROWTH IN THE
PLAN:
1. PROMOTE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT THROUGH THE
USE OF INNOVATIVE TECHNIQUES; AND
2. PROVIDE FOR THE STREAMLINED REVIEW OF
APPLICATIONS FOR DEVELOPMENT, INCLUDING PERMIT REVIEW AND SUBDIVISION
PLAT REVIEW.
(E) (1) IN PREPARING THE PLAN, THE PLANNING COMMISSION FOR A
LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY REQUEST THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING TO
FACILITATE STATE AGENCY ASSISTANCE WITH AVAILABLE DATA AND ANALYSIS.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL PROVIDE GUIDELINES
ON HOW TO ADDRESS THE ELEMENTS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AND
IDENTIFY BEST PRACTICES TO BE CONSIDERED.
[3–103.
(a) The development regulations element shall include the planning commission’s
recommendation for land development regulations to implement the plan.
– 27 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) The development regulations element shall encourage:
(1) the use of flexible development regulations to promote innovative and
cost–saving site design and protect the environment; and
(2) within the areas designated for growth in the plan:
(i) economic development through the use of innovative techniques;
and
(ii) streamlined review of applications for development, including
permit review and subdivision plat review.]
3–103.
(A) IN ADDITION TO IMPLEMENTING THE PLANNING PRINCIPLE IN §
1–201(B)(1) OF THIS ARTICLE, THE LAND ELEMENT SHALL ADDRESS:
(1) THE GENERAL DISTRIBUTION, LOCATION, AND EXTENT OF USES
OF THE LAND FOR HOUSING, BUSINESS, INDUSTRY, AGRICULTURE, RECREATION,
EDUCATION, PUBLIC BUILDINGS AND GROUNDS, OPEN SPACE, AND OTHER
CATEGORIES OF PUBLIC AND PRIVATE USES OF LAND APPROPRIATE TO THE LOCAL
JURISDICTION;
(2) DESIRED PATTERNS AND LOCATIONS OF GROWTH CONSIDERING
EFFECTIVE AND EFFICIENT DELIVERY OF COMMUNITY FACILITIES AND PUBLIC
SERVICES, AND THE PROTECTION AND PRESERVATION OF VULNERABLE NATURAL
AND HISTORICAL RESOURCES;
(3) COMMUNITY FACILITIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D)
OF THIS SECTION; AND
(4) IF APPLICABLE:
(I) MUNICIPAL GROWTH IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(E) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) MINERAL RESOURCES IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(F) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(III) FISHERIES IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS
SECTION.
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(B) (1) THE LAND ELEMENT SHALL BE INFORMED BY THE FOLLOWING
STATE PLANS:
(I) THE MARYLAND THE BEAUTIFUL PLAN, AS DESCRIBED IN §
5–104 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE;
(II) THE MARYLAND LAND PRESERVATION AND RECREATION
PLAN, AS DESCRIBED IN § 5–906 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE; AND
(III) THE STATEWIDE HISTORIC PRESERVATION PLAN, AS
REQUIRED UNDER THE NATIONAL HISTORIC PRESERVATION ACT.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE A LOCAL JURISDICTION WITH THE BEST
AVAILABLE POPULATION AND DEMOGRAPHIC DATA FROM THE U.S. CENSUS
BUREAU AND STATE–LEVEL LAND USE DATA; AND
(II) FACILITATE, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE PROVISION OF
DATA RELEVANT TO THE PREPARATION OF THE LAND ELEMENT FROM OTHER STATE
AND FEDERAL AGENCIES.
(C) THE LAND ELEMENT MAY INCLUDE:
(1) DESIGNATION OF EXISTING AND PROPOSED LAND USE PATTERNS
USING LAND USE MAPS THAT DEPICT THE TYPES OF USES WITH RANGES OF DENSITY
OR INTENSITY;
(2) IDENTIFICATION OF AREAS OF FUTURE PLANNED MIXED–USE
DEVELOPMENT FOR WHICH SPECIAL REGULATIONS MAY BE NECESSARY TO ENSURE
DEVELOPMENT IN ACCORD WITH THE PRINCIPLES AND STANDARDS OF THE
COMPREHENSIVE PLAN;
(3) IDENTIFICATION AND DEPICTION OF HISTORIC DISTRICT
BOUNDARIES AND HISTORICALLY SIGNIFICANT PROPERTIES MERITING
PROTECTION;
(4) IDENTIFICATION OF AREAS OF RESOURCE PROTECTION AND
PRESERVATION; AND
(5) THE FOLLOWING PUBLIC AND PRIVATE LAND USES:
– 29 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) AGRICULTURAL;
(II) COMMERCIAL;
(III) FORESTRY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–101 OF THE
NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE;
(IV) INDUSTRIAL;
(V) RECREATIONAL; AND
(VI) RESIDENTIAL.
(D) (1) THE LAND ELEMENT SHALL INCLUDE A COMMUNITY FACILITIES
SUBELEMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) ON A SCHEDULE THAT EXTENDS AS FAR INTO THE FUTURE AS IS
REASONABLE, THE COMMUNITY FACILITIES SUBELEMENT SHALL PROPOSE THE
MOST APPROPRIATE AND DESIRABLE PATTERNS FOR THE GENERAL LOCATION,
CHARACTER, AND EXTENT OF PUBLIC AND SEMIPUBLIC BUILDINGS, LAND, AND
FACILITIES.
(3) THE COMMUNITY FACILITIES SUBELEMENT MAY INCLUDE:
(I) PLACES OF WORSHIP;
(II) (I) FIRE STATIONS;
(III) HOSPITALS;
(IV) (II) INSTITUTIONS;
(V) (III) JAILS;
(VI) (IV) LIBRARIES;
(VII) (V) PARKS AND RECREATION AREAS;
(VIII) (VI) POLICE STATIONS;
(IX) (VII) SCHOOLS AND OTHER EDUCATIONAL FACILITIES;
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(X) (VIII) CULTURAL FACILITIES;
(XI) (IX) SOCIAL WELFARE AND MEDICAL FACILITIES; AND
(XII) (X) OTHER PUBLIC OFFICE OR ADMINISTRATIVE
FACILITIES.
(E) (1) IF THE PLAN COVERS A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, THE LAND
ELEMENT SHALL INCLUDE A MUNICIPAL GROWTH SUBELEMENT IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) THE MUNICIPAL GROWTH SUBELEMENT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION’S:
1. FUTURE MUNICIPAL GROWTH AREAS OUTSIDE THE
EXISTING CORPORATE LIMITS;
2. PAST GROWTH PATTERNS; AND
3. CAPACITY OF LAND AREAS AVAILABLE FOR
DEVELOPMENT, REDEVELOPMENT, AND IN–FILL;
(II) THE LAND AREA NEEDED TO SATISFY DEMAND FOR
DEVELOPMENT AT DENSITIES CONSISTENT WITH LONG–TERM DEVELOPMENT
POLICY;
(III) THE RELATIONSHIP OF THE LONG–TERM DEVELOPMENT
POLICY TO A VISION OF THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION’S FUTURE CHARACTER;
(IV) RURAL BUFFERS AND TRANSITION AREAS;
(V) PROTECTION OF SENSITIVE AREAS THAT COULD BE
IMPACTED BY DEVELOPMENT PLANNED WITHIN THE PROPOSED MUNICIPAL
GROWTH AREA;
(VI) POPULATION GROWTH PROJECTIONS;
(VII) PUBLIC SERVICES AND INFRASTRUCTURE NEEDED TO
ACCOMMODATE GROWTH WITHIN THE PROPOSED MUNICIPAL GROWTH AREAS,
INCLUDING THOSE NECESSARY FOR:
1. LIBRARIES;
– 31 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. RECREATION;
3. WATER AND SEWERAGE FACILITIES;
4. PUBLIC SAFETY, INCLUDING EMERGENCY MEDICAL
RESPONSE;
5. STORMWATER MANAGEMENT SYSTEMS SUFFICIENT
TO ENSURE WATER QUALITY BOTH INSIDE AND OUTSIDE THE PROPOSED MUNICIPAL
GROWTH AREA; AND
6. PUBLIC SCHOOLS SUFFICIENT TO ACCOMMODATE
STUDENT POPULATION CONSISTENT WITH STATE RATED CAPACITY STANDARDS
ESTABLISHED BY THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION ON SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION;
(VIII) ANY BURDEN ON SERVICES AND INFRASTRUCTURE FOR
WHICH THE MUNICIPAL CORPORATION WOULD BE RESPONSIBLE FOR
DEVELOPMENT IN AREAS NEAR TO AND OUTSIDE OF THE PROPOSED MUNICIPAL
GROWTH AREA; AND
(IX) ANTICIPATED FINANCING MECHANISMS TO SUPPORT
NECESSARY PUBLIC SERVICES AND INFRASTRUCTURE.
(3) ON REQUEST OF A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, THE DEPARTMENT
OF PLANNING SHALL PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE FOR THE PURPOSES OF
DEVELOPING THE MUNICIPAL GROWTH SUBELEMENT OF THE COMPREHENSIVE
PLAN.
(F) (1) IF CURRENT GEOLOGICAL INFORMATION IS AVAILABLE, THE
LAND ELEMENT SHALL INCLUDE A MINERAL RESOURCES SUBELEMENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) THE MINERAL RESOURCES SUBELEMENT SHALL IDENTIFY:
(I) UNDEVELOPED LAND THAT SHOULD BE KEPT IN ITS
UNDEVELOPED STATE UNTIL THE LAND CAN BE USED TO ASSIST IN PROVIDING A
CONTINUOUS SUPPLY OF MINERALS, AS DEFINED IN § 15–801 OF THE ENVIRONMENT
ARTICLE; AND
(II) APPROPRIATE POSTEXCAVATION USES FOR THE LAND THAT
ARE CONSISTENT WITH THE COUNTY’S LAND PLANNING PROCESS.
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(3) THE MINERAL RESOURCES SUBELEMENT SHALL INCORPORATE
LAND USE POLICIES AND RECOMMENDATIONS FOR REGULATIONS TO:
(I) BALANCE MINERAL RESOURCE EXTRACTION WITH OTHER
LAND USES; AND
(II) PREVENT THE PREEMPTION OF MINERAL RESOURCES
EXTRACTION BY OTHER USES TO THE EXTENT FEASIBLE.
(4) BEFORE THE PLAN IS ADOPTED, THE DEPARTMENT OF THE
ENVIRONMENT SHALL REVIEW THE MINERAL RESOURCES SUBELEMENT TO
DETERMINE WHETHER THE PROPOSED PLAN IS CONSISTENT WITH THE PROGRAMS
AND GOALS OF THE DEPARTMENT.
(G) (1) IF THE LOCAL JURISDICTION IS LOCATED ON THE TIDAL WATERS
OF THE STATE, THE LAND ELEMENT SHALL INCLUDE A FISHERIES SUBELEMENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) THE FISHERIES SUBELEMENT SHALL DESIGNATE AREAS ON OR
NEAR THE TIDAL WATERS FOR:
(I) LOADING, UNLOADING, AND PROCESSING FINFISH AND
SHELLFISH; AND
(II) DOCKING AND MOORING COMMERCIAL FISHING BOATS AND
VESSELS.
(3) THE AREAS DESIGNATED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE GEOGRAPHICALLY LOCATED TO:
(I) FACILITATE THE COMMERCIAL HARVESTING OF FINFISH
AND SHELLFISH; AND
(II) ENSURE REASONABLE ACCESS TO THE WATERWAYS OF THE
STATE BY COMMERCIAL WATERMEN.
(H) THE LAND ELEMENT MAY INCLUDE A PRIORITY PRESERVATION AREA
SUBELEMENT DEVELOPED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–518 OF THE AGRICULTURE
ARTICLE.
[3–104.
– 33 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (1) A sensitive areas element shall include the goals, objectives, principles,
policies, and standards designed to protect sensitive areas from the adverse effects of
development.
(2) A local jurisdiction shall consider wildlife movement and habitat
connectivity when enacting, adopting, amending, or executing a plan in accordance with §
3–101 of this subtitle.
(b) (1) Beginning October 1, 2013, the Department of Natural Resources shall
provide a statewide forest resource inventory to local jurisdictions at least every 5 years, to
be available for the local comprehensive plan review by local jurisdictions required under
§§ 1–416(a) and 3–301(a) of this article.
(2) The Department of Planning shall coordinate with the Department of
Natural Resources and the State Highway Administration to provide each local jurisdiction
with updated information on habitat connectivity concerns and current and planned
wildlife crossings.
(c) Before the plan is adopted, the Department of the Environment and the
Department of Natural Resources shall review the sensitive areas element to determine
whether the proposed plan is consistent with the programs and goals of the departments.]
3–104.
(A) IN ADDITION TO IMPLEMENTING THE PLANNING PRINCIPLE IN §
1–201(B)(2) OF THIS ARTICLE, THE TRANSPORTATION ELEMENT SHALL ADDRESS:
(1) A SAFE, BALANCED TRANSPORTATION SYSTEM FOR THE
MOVEMENT OF PEOPLE AND GOODS;
(2) A RANGE OF SUSTAINABLE TRANSPORTATION CHOICES FOR
FUTURE TRANSPORTATION NEEDS; AND
(3) COORDINATION WITH THE LAND ELEMENT TO ENSURE
TRANSPORTATION EFFICIENCY FOR EXISTING AND PLANNED DEVELOPMENT.
(B) (1) THE TRANSPORTATION ELEMENT SHALL BE INFORMED BY THE
FOLLOWING STATE PLANS:
(I) THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION PLAN, AS DESCRIBED
IN § 2–103.1 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE;
(II) THE STATEWIDE 20–YEAR BICYCLE–PEDESTRIAN MASTER
PLAN, AS DESCRIBED IN § 2–604 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE; AND
– 34 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(III) THE MARYLAND STATE FREIGHT PLAN, AS REQUIRED
UNDER 49 U.S.C. § 70202.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE THE LOCAL JURISDICTION WITH THE BEST
AVAILABLE STATE–LEVEL DATA; AND
(II) FACILITATE, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE PROVISION OF
DATA RELEVANT TO THE PREPARATION OF THE TRANSPORTATION ELEMENT FROM
OTHER STATE AND FEDERAL AGENCIES.
(C) THE TRANSPORTATION ELEMENT MAY INCLUDE ALL TYPES OF:
(1) AIRWAYS;
(2) HIGHWAYS OR STREETS;
(3) RAILWAYS;
(4) WATERWAYS;
(5) ROUTINGS FOR MASS TRANSIT; AND
(6) TERMINALS FOR INDIVIDUALS, GOODS, AND VEHICLES RELATED
TO AIRWAYS, HIGHWAYS, RAILWAYS, AND WATERWAYS.
(D) THE TRANSPORTATION ELEMENT SHALL:
(1) PROPOSE, ON A SCHEDULE THAT EXTENDS AS FAR INTO THE
FUTURE AS IS REASONABLE, THE MOST APPROPRIATE AND DESIRABLE PATTERNS
FOR:
(I) THE GENERAL LOCATION, CHARACTER, AND EXTENT OF
CHANNELS, ROUTES, AND TERMINALS FOR TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES; AND
(II) THE CIRCULATION OF INDIVIDUALS AND GOODS;
(2) PROVIDE FOR BICYCLE AND PEDESTRIAN ACCESS AND
TRAVELWAYS; AND
– 35 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) INCLUDE AN ESTIMATE OF THE USE OF ANY PROPOSED
IMPROVEMENT.
[3–105.
(a) The transportation element may include all types of:
(1) airways;
(2) highways or streets;
(3) railways;
(4) waterways;
(5) routings for mass transit; and
(6) terminals for individuals, goods, and vehicles related to airways,
highways, railways, and waterways.
(b) The transportation element shall:
(1) propose, on a schedule that extends as far into the future as is
reasonable, the most appropriate and desirable patterns for:
(i) the general location, character, and extent of channels, routes,
and terminals for transportation facilities; and
(ii) the circulation of individuals and goods;
(2) provide for bicycle and pedestrian access and travelways; and
(3) include an estimate of the use of any proposed improvement.]
3–105.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AFFIRMATIVELY FURTHER FAIR HOUSING” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 2–401 OF THE HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “AREA MEDIAN INCOME” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 4–1801
OF THE HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
– 36 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(4) “LOW–INCOME HOUSING” MEANS HOUSING THAT IS AFFORDABLE
FOR A HOUSEHOLD WITH AN AGGREGATE ANNUAL INCOME THAT IS BELOW 60% OF
THE AREA MEDIAN INCOME.
(5) “WORKFORCE HOUSING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 4–1801
OF THE HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
(B) IN ADDITION TO IMPLEMENTING THE PLANNING PRINCIPLE IN §
1–201(B)(3) OF THIS ARTICLE, THE HOUSING ELEMENT SHALL ADDRESS:
(1) THE PROVISION OF AN ADEQUATE SUPPLY OF HOUSING TO
ACCOMMODATE ALL CURRENT AND ANTICIPATED FUTURE RESIDENTS OF THE
LOCAL JURISDICTION;
(2) THE AGE, STRUCTURAL TYPE, VALUE, AND OCCUPANCY
CHARACTERISTICS OF THE LOCAL JURISDICTION’S HOUSING STOCK;
(3) THE ELIMINATION OF SUBSTANDARD DWELLING CONDITIONS;
AND
(4) THE PROVISION OF ADEQUATE SITES FOR FUTURE HOUSING,
INCLUDING AFFORDABLE HOUSING.
(C) (1) THE HOUSING ELEMENT SHALL BE INFORMED BY THE MARYLAND
HOUSING NEEDS ASSESSMENT & 10–YEAR STRATEGIC PLAN FOLLOWING STATE
PLANS:
(I) THE FAIR HOUSING CHOICE AND RACIAL AND ECONOMIC
HOUSING INTEGRATION REPORT, AS DESCRIBED IN § 2–302 OF THE HOUSING AND
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE; AND
(II) THE STATE OF MARYLAND FIVE YEAR CONSOLIDATED
PLAN, AS REQUIRED BY 24 C.F.R. § 91.300.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL:
1. PROVIDE A LOCAL JURISDICTION WITH THE BEST
AVAILABLE HOUSING DATA FROM THE U.S. CENSUS BUREAU; AND
2. FACILITATE, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE
PROVISION OF DATA RELEVANT TO THE PREPARATION OF THE HOUSING ELEMENT
FROM OTHER STATE AND FEDERAL AGENCIES.
– 37 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE LOCAL JURISDICTION WITH THE BEST
AVAILABLE STATE–LEVEL HOUSING DATA.
(D) A HOUSING ELEMENT MAY INCLUDE GOALS, OBJECTIVES, POLICIES,
PLANS, AND STANDARDS.
(E) A HOUSING ELEMENT SHALL ADDRESS THE NEED FOR AFFORDABLE
HOUSING WITHIN THE LOCAL JURISDICTION, INCLUDING:
(1) WORKFORCE HOUSING; AND
(2) LOW–INCOME HOUSING.
(F) (1) A LOCAL JURISDICTION HAS A DUTY TO AFFIRMATIVELY FURTHER
FAIR HOUSING THROUGH THE LOCAL JURISDICTION’S HOUSING AND URBAN
DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS.
(2) THE HOUSING ELEMENT OF A COMPREHENSIVE PLAN THAT IS
ENACTED OR AMENDED ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2023, SHALL INCLUDE AN
ASSESSMENT OF FAIR HOUSING TO ENSURE THAT THE LOCAL JURISDICTION IS
AFFIRMATIVELY FURTHERING FAIR HOUSING.
(3) ON REQUEST OF A LOCAL JURISDICTION, THE DEPARTMENT OF
PLANNING, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT, SHALL PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE FOR THE
PURPOSE OF DEVELOPING THE HOUSING ELEMENT OF THE COMPREHENSIVE PLAN.
(4) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT REQUIRE A LOCAL JURISDICTION TO
TAKE, OR PROHIBIT A LOCAL JURISDICTION FROM TAKING, A SPECIFIC ACTION TO
AFFIRMATIVELY FURTHER FAIR HOUSING.
[3–106.
(a) Considering available data provided by the Department of the Environment,
the water resources element shall identify:
(1) drinking water and other water resources that will be adequate for the
needs of existing and future development proposed in the land use element of the plan; and
(2) suitable receiving waters and land areas to meet stormwater
management and wastewater treatment and disposal needs of existing and future
development proposed in the land use element of the plan.
– 38 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(b) The Department of the Environment shall:
(1) provide, on request of a local jurisdiction, technical assistance on the
development of the water resources element; and
(2) review the water resources element to determine whether the proposed
plan is consistent with the programs and goals of the Department reflected in the general
water resources program required under § 5–203 of the Environment Article.]
3–106.
(A) IN ADDITION TO IMPLEMENTING THE PLANNING PRINCIPLE IN §
1–201(B)(4) OF THIS ARTICLE, THE ECONOMY ELEMENT SHALL ADDRESS:
(1) THE ECONOMIC BASE, LABOR FORCE CHARACTERISTICS, AND
LOCAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITIES AND RESOURCES OF THE LOCAL
JURISDICTION;
(2) THE CATEGORIES OR TYPES OF BUSINESSES AND INDUSTRIES
DESIRED IN THE LOCAL JURISDICTION; AND
(3) THE COORDINATION OF INFORMATION ABOUT POPULATION
TRENDS AND CHARACTERISTICS, NATURAL RESOURCES, COMMUNITY FACILITIES
AND SERVICES, TRANSPORTATION, HOUSING, AND LAND USE SO THAT A STRATEGY
FOR THE ECONOMIC WELL–BEING OF THE LOCAL JURISDICTION CAN BE
DEVELOPED.
(B) (1) THE ECONOMY ELEMENT SHALL BE INFORMED BY THE
FOLLOWING STATE PLANS:
(I) THE STATE WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT PLAN, AS
REQUIRED UNDER THE FEDERAL WORKFORCE INNOVATION AND OPPORTUNITY
ACT FOR A 4–YEAR COMBINED STATE PLAN; AND
(II) THE MARYLAND STATE PLAN FOR POSTSECONDARY
EDUCATION, AS DESCRIBED IN § 11–105 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL:
1. PROVIDE THE LOCAL JURISDICTION WITH THE BEST
AVAILABLE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT DATA FROM THE U.S. CENSUS BUREAU; AND
– 39 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. FACILITATE, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE
PROVISION OF DATA RELEVANT TO THE PREPARATION OF THE ECONOMIC ELEMENT
FROM OTHER STATE AND FEDERAL AGENCIES.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE SHALL PROVIDE A
LOCAL JURISDICTION WITH THE BEST AVAILABLE STATE–LEVEL DATA ON
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
(III) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR SHALL PROVIDE
A LOCAL JURISDICTION WITH THE BEST AVAILABLE STATE–LEVEL DATA ON THE
LABOR FORCE.
(C) THE ECONOMY ELEMENT MAY INCLUDE:
(1) AN ASSESSMENT OF ECONOMIC SECTORS TO DETERMINE
WHETHER AVAILABLE JOBS ALIGN WITH LOCAL LABOR FORCE CHARACTERISTICS,
COMMUTING PATTERNS, AND WAGES PAID, AND WHAT STRATEGIES COULD IMPROVE
THE EXISTING ECONOMIC SITUATION;
(2) AN ANALYSIS OF EXISTING LOCAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
PROGRAMS AND TOOLS AND WHAT STRATEGIES ARE NEEDED TO FOSTER ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT;
(3) AN ASSESSMENT OF ECONOMIC ASSETS, PROBLEMS, AND
OPPORTUNITIES OF THE LOCAL ECONOMY IN A REGIONAL CONTEXT AND WHAT
STRATEGIES ARE NEEDED TO POSITION THE LOCAL ECONOMY IN THE LARGER
REGIONAL CONTEXT; AND
(4) AN ASSESSMENT OF COMMUNITY REDEVELOPMENT
OPPORTUNITIES AND WHAT STRATEGIES AND PROGRAMS SHOULD BE PURSUED.
[3–107.
(a) The mineral resources element shall identify:
(1) undeveloped land that should be kept in its undeveloped state until the
land can be used to assist in providing a continuous supply of minerals, as defined in §
15–801(i) of the Environment Article; and
(2) appropriate postexcavation uses for the land that are consistent with
the county’s land planning process.
– 40 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(b) A mineral resources element shall incorporate land use policies and
recommendations for regulations:
(1) to balance mineral resource extraction with other land uses; and
(2) to the extent feasible, to prevent the preemption of mineral resources
extraction by other uses.
(c) Before the plan is adopted, the Department of the Environment shall review
the mineral resources element to determine whether the proposed plan is consistent with
the programs and goals of the Department.]
3–107.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
1–701 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(3) “OVERBURDENED COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
1–701 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(4) “UNDERSERVED COMMUNITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
1–701 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(B) IN ADDITION TO IMPLEMENTING THE PLANNING PRINCIPLE IN §
1–201(B)(5) OF THIS ARTICLE, THE EQUITY ELEMENT SHALL ADDRESS:
(1) THE NEEDS OF OVERBURDENED AND UNDERSERVED
COMMUNITIES IN THE LOCAL JURISDICTION; AND
(2) POPULATIONS IN THE LOCAL JURISDICTION THAT TYPICALLY
HAVE NOT PARTICIPATED IN THE PLANNING PROCESS.
(C) (1) THE EQUITY ELEMENT SHALL BE INFORMED BY THE ANNUAL
REPORT OF THE COMMISSION ON ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE AND SUSTAINABLE
COMMUNITIES, AS DESCRIBED IN § 1–701 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL:
1. PROVIDE THE LOCAL JURISDICTION WITH THE BEST
AVAILABLE POPULATION AND DEMOGRAPHIC DATA FROM THE U.S. CENSUS
BUREAU; AND
– 41 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. FACILITATE, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE
PROVISION OF DATA RELEVANT TO THE PREPARATION OF THE EQUITY ELEMENT
FROM OTHER STATE AND FEDERAL AGENCIES.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT SHALL PROVIDE
A LOCAL JURISDICTION WITH DATA ON ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE.
(D) THE EQUITY ELEMENT MAY INCLUDE POTENTIAL STRATEGIES TO:
(1) PROMOTE BROADER CIVIC ENGAGEMENT IN THE PUBLIC
DECISION–MAKING PROCESS;
(2) REDUCE THE UNIQUE OR COMPOUNDED HEALTH RISKS IN
OVERBURDENED AND UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES; AND
(3) PRIORITIZE IMPROVEMENTS AND PROGRAMS THAT ADDRESS THE
NEEDS OF OVERBURDENED AND UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES.
[3–108.
(a) On a schedule that extends as far into the future as is reasonable, a
community facilities element shall propose the most appropriate and desirable patterns for
the general location, character, and extent of public and semipublic buildings, land, and
facilities.
(b) A community facilities element may include:
(1) places of worship;
(2) fire stations;
(3) hospitals;
(4) institutions;
(5) jails;
(6) libraries;
(7) parks and recreation areas;
(8) police stations;
– 42 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(9) schools and other educational facilities;
(10) cultural facilities;
(11) social welfare and medical facilities; and
(12) other public office or administrative facilities.]
3–108.
(A) IN ADDITION TO IMPLEMENTING THE PLANNING PRINCIPLE IN §
1–201(B)(6) OF THIS ARTICLE, THE RESILIENCE ELEMENT SHALL ADDRESS:
(1) THE COORDINATION OF LOCAL PREPAREDNESS EFFORTS TO
IDENTIFY POTENTIAL THREATS FACING THE LOCAL JURISDICTION WITH THE
LONG–TERM STRATEGIES TO AVOID, REDUCE, AND RECOVER FROM CHANGING
CONDITIONS AND ASSOCIATED DISASTERS; AND
(2) THE MUTUAL ASSISTANCE NEEDED AMONG STATE AND LOCAL
PARTNERS TO RESPOND TO THE CHALLENGES OF CHANGING CONDITIONS AND
DISASTERS, INCLUDING HUMAN–CAUSED AND NATURAL HAZARDS, AND TO BUILD,
ADVANCE, AND MAINTAIN CAPACITIES RELATED TO QUALITY OF LIFE, HEALTH AND
WELL–BEING, DURABLE SYSTEMS, ECONOMIC VITALITY, HUMAN–MADE AND
NATURE–BASED INFRASTRUCTURE, AND SUSTAINABLE ENVIRONMENTAL SYSTEMS.
(B) (1) THE RESILIENCE ELEMENT SHALL BE INFORMED BY THE
FOLLOWING STATE PLANS:
(I) THE STATE RESILIENCE STRATEGY, AS DESCRIBED IN §
14–1202 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE; AND
(II) THE STATE OF MARYLAND HAZARD MITIGATION PLAN, AS
REQUIRED UNDER 44 C.F.R. PART 201.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE A LOCAL JURISDICTION WITH THE BEST
AVAILABLE POPULATION, DEMOGRAPHIC, ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, AND HOUSING
DATA FROM THE U.S. CENSUS BUREAU AND OTHER STANDARD SOURCES; AND
(II) FACILITATE, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE PROVISION OF
DATA RELEVANT TO THE PREPARATION OF THE RESILIENCE ELEMENT FROM OTHER
STATE AGENCIES.
– 43 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) THE RESILIENCE ELEMENT MAY INCLUDE:
(1) AN INVENTORY OF AREAS SUSCEPTIBLE TO A NATURAL OR
HUMAN–CAUSED HAZARD, SUCH AS FLOODING, INCLUDING RIVERINE AND COASTAL
FLOODING, SEA–LEVEL RISE, AND COASTAL STORM SURGE, WHICH INVENTORY MAY
CONSIDER THE POTENTIAL DISASTER IMPACTS ON INDIVIDUALS, COMMUNITIES,
INSTITUTIONS, BUSINESSES, ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE
AND FACILITIES, AND PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY, AND WELFARE;
(2) AN INVENTORY OF EXISTING RESILIENCE CONDITIONS THAT
PROMOTE RESILIENT PLANNING, DESIGN, AND DEVELOPMENT, AND THAT MAY BE
COORDINATED WITH OTHER JURISDICTIONS AND STATE AGENCIES; AND
(3) RECOMMENDED STRATEGIES AND POLICIES:
(I) TO PROTECT SUSCEPTIBLE AREAS AND RESOURCES AND
MITIGATE RISKS TO PUBLIC SAFETY, CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE, HISTORIC
STRUCTURES, PUBLIC INVESTMENTS, AND OTHER COMMUNITY RESOURCES; AND
(II) THAT ARE INTENDED TO:
1. REDUCE RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH IDENTIFIED
HAZARDS;
2. ADAPT TO CHANGING CONDITIONS; AND
3. PROMOTE QUICKER RECOVERY AFTER A DISASTER.
[3–109.
The areas of critical State concern element shall include the planning commission’s
recommendations for the determination, identification, and designation of areas within the
local jurisdiction that are of critical State concern.]
3–109.
(A) IN ADDITION TO IMPLEMENTING THE PLANNING PRINCIPLE IN §
1–201(B)(7) OF THIS ARTICLE, THE PLACE ELEMENT SHALL:
(1) PLAN, DESIGN, AND PROGRAM PLAN NEW OR REVITALIZED PUBLIC
SPACES TO STRENGTHEN COMMUNITY COHESION WHILE CONTRIBUTING TO PUBLIC
HEALTH, CONNECTING PEOPLE WITH CULTURAL HERITAGES, CONSERVING
– 44 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
NATURAL RESOURCES, IMPROVING RESILIENCE, AND STRENGTHENING THE LOCAL
ECONOMY; AND
(2) PROMOTE THE ACTIVE CARE AND MAINTENANCE OF PUBLIC
SPACES BY THE PEOPLE WHO LIVE AND WORK THERE, SUPPORTING THE
CONTINUATION OF LOCAL WAYS OF LIFE AND CULTURAL MEMORIES.
(B) (1) THE PLACE ELEMENT SHALL BE INFORMED BY THE FOLLOWING
STATE PLANS:
(I) THE MARYLAND LAND PRESERVATION AND RECREATION
PLAN, AS DESCRIBED IN § 5–906 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE; AND
(II) THE STATEWIDE HISTORIC PRESERVATION PLAN, AS
REQUIRED UNDER THE NATIONAL HISTORIC PRESERVATION ACT.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE A LOCAL JURISDICTION WITH THE BEST
AVAILABLE POPULATION, DEMOGRAPHIC, ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, AND HOUSING
DATA FROM THE U.S. CENSUS BUREAU AND OTHER STANDARD SOURCES; AND
(II) FACILITATE, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE PROVISION OF
DATA RELEVANT TO THE PREPARATION OF THE PLACE ELEMENT FROM OTHER
STATE AND FEDERAL AGENCIES.
(C) THE PLACE ELEMENT MAY INCLUDE:
(1) AN INVENTORY OF GATHERING PLACES FOR SOCIAL
INTERACTIONS AND CENTERS OF ECONOMIC ACTIVITY;
(2) AN ANALYSIS OF PUBLIC SPACES TO IDENTIFY THOSE OF UNIQUE
CULTURAL AND HISTORICAL SIGNIFICANCE; AND
(3) RECOMMENDED STRATEGIES, POLICIES, AND PROGRAMS TO
BUILD SOCIAL COHESION AND COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT.
[3–110.
(a) The goals and objectives element shall include a statement of goals and
objectives, principles, policies, and standards.
– 45 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) The statement shall serve as a guide for the development and economic and
social well–being of the local jurisdiction.]
3–110.
(A) IN ADDITION TO IMPLEMENTING THE PLANNING PRINCIPLE IN §
1–201(B)(8) OF THIS ARTICLE, THE ECOLOGY ELEMENT SHALL ADDRESS:
(1) THE PROTECTION OF THE ENVIRONMENT AND NATURAL
RESOURCES, INCLUDING AGRICULTURAL RESOURCES, MINERAL RESOURCES, AND
WATER AND AIR QUALITY;
(2) THE PROTECTION OF SIGNIFICANT ARCHITECTURAL, SCENIC,
CULTURAL, HISTORICAL, OR ARCHAEOLOGICAL RESOURCES;
(3) THE CONSERVATION, USE, AND PROTECTION OF NATURAL
RESOURCES;
(4) THE PRESERVATION AND ENHANCEMENT OF PRIME
AGRICULTURAL LAND AND STRATEGIES TO ENCOURAGE THE COMPATIBILITY OF
LAND USE WITH AGRICULTURAL OPERATIONS;
(5) THE PROTECTION OF A RELIABLE SUPPLY OF WATER AND ITS USES
AND LIMITATIONS;
(6) PREVENTING THE DEGRADATION OF THE ABOVE RESOURCES DUE
TO FUTURE DEVELOPMENT PATTERNS PROPOSED IN THE LAND ELEMENT;
(7) GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS FROM ANY ADDITIONAL VEHICLE
MILES TRAVELED LIKELY TO RESULT FROM FUTURE DEVELOPMENT PATTERNS
PROPOSED IN THE LAND ELEMENT;
(8) SENSITIVE AREAS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(9) WATER RESOURCES IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (E) OF
THIS SECTION.
(B) (1) THE ECOLOGY ELEMENT SHALL BE INFORMED BY THE
FOLLOWING STATE PLANS:
(I) MARYLAND’S CLIMATE POLLUTION REDUCTION PLAN, AS
DESCRIBED IN § 2–1205 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE;
– 46 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(II) THE MARYLAND LAND PRESERVATION AND RECREATION
PLAN, AS DESCRIBED IN § 5–906 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE; AND
(III) THE STATEWIDE COMPREHENSIVE OUTDOOR RECREATION
PLAN, AS REQUIRED UNDER THE FEDERAL LAND AND WATER CONSERVATION
FUND ACT OF 1965.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE A LOCAL JURISDICTION WITH THE BEST
AVAILABLE POPULATION, DEMOGRAPHIC, ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, AND HOUSING
DATA FROM THE U.S. CENSUS BUREAU AND OTHER STANDARD SOURCES; AND
(II) FACILITATE, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE PROVISION OF
DATA RELEVANT TO THE PREPARATION OF THE ECOLOGY ELEMENT FROM OTHER
STATE AND FEDERAL AGENCIES.
(C) THE ECOLOGY ELEMENT MAY INCLUDE:
(1) AN INVENTORY OF NATURAL, HISTORICAL, AND
ENVIRONMENTALLY SENSITIVE RESOURCES;
(2) AN EVALUATION OF THE ISSUES, PROBLEMS, AND OPPORTUNITIES
ASSOCIATED WITH THE RESOURCES; AND
(3) STRATEGIES AND POLICIES FOR THE APPROPRIATE USE,
PRESERVATION AND PROTECTION OF THESE RESOURCES THAT ARE CONSISTENT
WITH THE STRATEGIES AND POLICIES ESTABLISHED FOR OTHER PLAN ELEMENTS.
(D) (1) THE ECOLOGY ELEMENT SHALL INCLUDE A SENSITIVE AREAS
SUBELEMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) THE SENSITIVE AREAS SUBELEMENT SHALL:
(I) INCLUDE GOALS, OBJECTIVES, PRINCIPLES, POLICIES, AND
STANDARDS DESIGNED TO PROTECT SENSITIVE AREAS FROM THE ADVERSE
EFFECTS OF DEVELOPMENT;
(II) BE INFORMED BY CURRENT STATE AND FEDERAL
REQUIREMENTS REGARDING THE PROTECTION OF SENSITIVE AREAS; AND
– 47 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(III) INDICATE WHAT ADDITIONAL MEASURES, IF ANY, THE
LOCAL JURISDICTION PROPOSES TO IMPLEMENT BEYOND THE REQUIREMENTS
DESCRIBED IN ITEM (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(3) A LOCAL JURISDICTION SHALL CONSIDER WILDLIFE MOVEMENT
AND HABITAT CONNECTIVITY WHEN ENACTING, ADOPTING, AMENDING, OR
EXECUTING A PLAN IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–101 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(4) (I) THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES SHALL
PROVIDE A LOCAL JURISDICTION WITH A STATEWIDE FOREST RESOURCE
INVENTORY AT LEAST EVERY 5 YEARS, TO BE AVAILABLE FOR THE LOCAL
COMPREHENSIVE PLAN REVIEW BY LOCAL JURISDICTIONS REQUIRED UNDER §
3–301(A) OF THIS TITLE.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL COORDINATE
WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES AND THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION TO PROVIDE EACH LOCAL JURISDICTION WITH UPDATED
INFORMATION ON HABITAT CONNECTIVITY CONCERNS AND CURRENT AND PLANNED
WILDLIFE CROSSINGS.
(5) BEFORE THE PLAN IS ADOPTED, THE DEPARTMENT OF THE
ENVIRONMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES SHALL REVIEW
THE SENSITIVE AREAS SUBELEMENT TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE PROPOSED
PLAN IS CONSISTENT WITH THE PROGRAMS AND GOALS OF THE DEPARTMENTS.
(E) (1) THE ECOLOGY ELEMENT SHALL INCLUDE A WATER RESOURCES
SUBELEMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) CONSIDERING AVAILABLE DATA PROVIDED BY THE DEPARTMENT
OF THE ENVIRONMENT, THE WATER RESOURCES SUBELEMENT SHALL IDENTIFY:
(I) DRINKING WATER AND OTHER WATER RESOURCES THAT
WILL BE ADEQUATE FOR THE NEEDS OF EXISTING AND FUTURE DEVELOPMENT
PROPOSED IN THE LAND ELEMENT OF THE PLAN; AND
(II) SUITABLE RECEIVING WATERS AND LAND AREAS TO MEET
STORMWATER MANAGEMENT AND WASTEWATER TREATMENT AND DISPOSAL NEEDS
OF EXISTING AND FUTURE DEVELOPMENT PROPOSED IN THE LAND ELEMENT OF THE
PLAN.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT SHALL:
– 48 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(I) PROVIDE, ON REQUEST OF A LOCAL JURISDICTION,
TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE ON THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE WATER RESOURCES
SUBELEMENT; AND
(II) REVIEW THE WATER RESOURCES SUBELEMENT TO
DETERMINE WHETHER THE PROPOSED PLAN IS CONSISTENT WITH THE PROGRAMS
AND GOALS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT REFLECTED IN THE
GENERAL WATER RESOURCES PROGRAM REQUIRED UNDER § 5–203 OF THE
ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE.
[3–111.
(a) On a schedule that extends as far into the future as is reasonable, the land
use element shall propose the most appropriate and desirable patterns for the general
location, character, extent, and interrelationship of the uses of public and private land.
(b) The land use element may include the following public and private land uses:
(1) agricultural;
(2) commercial;
(3) forestry, in accordance with § 5–101 of the Natural Resources Article;
(4) industrial;
(5) recreational; and
(6) residential.]
[3–112.
(a) The municipal growth element shall include:
(1) the municipal corporation’s:
(i) future municipal growth areas outside the existing corporate
limits;
(ii) past growth patterns;
(iii) capacity of land areas available for development, redevelopment,
and in–fill;
– 49 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) the land area needed to satisfy demand for development at densities
consistent with long–term development policy;
(3) the relationship of the long–term development policy to a vision of the
municipal corporation’s future character;
(4) rural buffers and transition areas;
(5) protection of sensitive areas that could be impacted by development
planned within the proposed municipal growth area;
(6) population growth projections;
(7) public services and infrastructure needed to accommodate growth
within the proposed municipal growth areas, including those necessary for:
(i) libraries;
(ii) recreation;
(iii) water and sewerage facilities;
(iv) public safety, including emergency medical response;
(v) stormwater management systems sufficient to ensure water
quality both inside and outside the proposed municipal growth area; and
(vi) public schools sufficient to accommodate student population
consistent with State rated capacity standards established by the Interagency Commission
on School Construction;
(8) any burden on services and infrastructure for which the municipal
corporation would be responsible for development in areas near to and outside of the
proposed municipal growth area; and
(9) anticipated financing mechanisms to support necessary public services
and infrastructure.
(b) On request of a municipal corporation, the Department of Planning shall
provide technical assistance for the purposes of developing the municipal growth element
of the comprehensive plan.]
[3–113.
(a) The planning commission of a county that is located on the tidal waters of the
State shall designate in the comprehensive plan areas on or near the tidal waters for:
– 50 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
(1) loading, unloading, and processing finfish and shellfish; and
(2) docking and mooring commercial fishing boats and vessels.
(b) The areas designated under subsection (a) of this section shall be
geographically located to:
(1) facilitate the commercial harvesting of finfish and shellfish; and
(2) ensure reasonable access to the waterways of the State by commercial
watermen.]
[3–114.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Affirmatively further fair housing” has the meaning stated in § 2–401
of the Housing and Community Development Article.
(3) “Area median income” has the meaning stated in § 4–1801 of the
Housing and Community Development Article.
(4) “Low–income housing” means housing that is affordable for a household
with an aggregate annual income that is below 60% of the area median income.
(5) “Workforce housing” has the meaning stated in § 4–1801 of the Housing
and Community Development Article.
(b) A housing element may include goals, objectives, policies, plans, and
standards.
(c) A housing element shall address the need for affordable housing within the
local jurisdiction, including:
(1) workforce housing; and
(2) low–income housing.
(d) (1) Local jurisdictions have a duty to affirmatively further fair housing
through their housing and urban development programs.
(2) The housing element of a comprehensive plan that is enacted or
amended on or after January 1, 2023, shall include an assessment of fair housing to ensure
that the local jurisdiction is affirmatively furthering fair housing.
– 51 –

Ch. 111 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) On request of a local jurisdiction, the Department of Planning, in
consultation with the Department of Housing and Community Development, shall provide
technical assistance for the purpose of developing the housing element of the
comprehensive plan.
(4) This subsection does not require a local jurisdiction to take, or prohibit
a local jurisdiction from taking, a specific action to affirmatively further fair housing.]
3–206.
(a) (1) When developing a municipal growth [element] SUBELEMENT of the
comprehensive plan, a municipal corporation shall consult with the counties in which the
municipal corporation is located.
(2) A municipal corporation shall provide a copy of a municipal growth
[element] SUBELEMENT to the counties in which the municipal corporation is located
before approval of the element.
(b) (1) The municipal corporation shall accept comments from the counties for
30 days after providing a copy of the municipal growth [element] SUBELEMENT to the
counties in which the municipal corporation is located.
(2) Within 30 days following the close of the comment period under
paragraph (1) of this subsection, the counties and the municipal corporation shall meet and
confer regarding the municipal growth [element] SUBELEMENT.
(3) On request of either party, the county and the municipal corporation
shall employ an appropriate mediation and conflict resolution service to facilitate the
meeting and conferral under this subsection.
(c) (1) A municipal corporation and the counties in which the municipal
corporation is located may enter into a joint planning agreement in order to coordinate
implementation of a municipal growth [element] SUBELEMENT.
(2) A joint planning agreement shall consider the municipal growth
[element] SUBELEMENT required under Subtitle 1 of this title.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act. The
publisher shall adequately describe any correction that is made in an editor’s note following
the section affected.
– 52 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 111
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to a county or municipal corporation that amends, revises, readopts, or modifies
a comprehensive plan, or that begins the process of amending, revising, readopting, or
modifying a comprehensive plan, before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 4. 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 53 –